Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3827
(UTC 401) Methods of creating trust.

(UTC 401) A trust may be created by:

(1) transfer of property to another person as trustee during the settlor's lifetime or by will or other disposition taking effect upon the settlor's death;

(2) except as required by a statute other than the Nebraska Uniform Trust Code, declaration by the owner of property that the owner holds identifiable property as trustee; or

(3) exercise of a power of appointment in favor of a trustee.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 27.

Under subsection (1) of this section, a trust may be created in life insurance death benefits. In re Trust of Rosenberg, 273 Neb. 59, 727 N.W.2d 430 (2007).